Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
ARTICLE 54
REFUNDING REVENUE SECURITIES LAW

Cross references:

For refunding of economic development revenue bonds, see § 29-3-116.

Section

11-54-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Refunding Revenue Securities Law".

Source:

L. 63:

p. 886, § 7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 125-8-1.

11-54-102. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Facility" means any of the facilities or properties, revenues derived from the operation of which are pledged to the payment of public securities.

Repealed.

"Governing body" means the city council, commission, board of county commissioners, board of trustees, board of directors, or other legislative body of the public body designated in this article in which body the legislative powers of the public body are vested.

"Issuer" means the state or public body issuing any public security.

"May" is permissive.

"Net effective interest rate" means the net interest cost of public securities divided by the sum of the products derived by multiplying the principal amounts of the securities maturing on each maturity date by the number of years from their date to their respective maturities. In all cases the net effective interest rate shall be computed without regard to any option of redemption prior to the designated maturity dates of the public securities.

"Net interest cost" means the total amount of interest to accrue on public securities from their dates to their respective maturities, less the amount of any premium above par, or plus the amount of any discount below par, at which said public securities are being or have been sold. In all cases the net interest cost shall be computed without regard to any option of redemption prior to the designated maturity dates of the public securities.

"Ordinance" means an ordinance of a city or town or resolution or other instrument by which a governing body of the state or public body exercising any power under this article takes formal action and adopts legislative provisions and matters of some permanency.

"Public body of the state" means the transportation commission; any state educational institution, or other state institution, its board of regents, or other governing body thereof constituting a body corporate; any county; any incorporated city or incorporated town, whether incorporated or governed under a general act, special legislative act, or special charter enacted, granted, or adopted pursuant to article XX of the state constitution, or otherwise; any school district; and any metropolitan district, metropolitan sewage disposal district, metropolitan water district, water district, sanitation district, water and sanitation district, water conservancy district, metropolitan recreation district, health service district, city housing authority, county housing authority, urban renewal agency, community redevelopment agency, any other corporate district, any other corporate authority, any corporate commission, or any other political subdivision of the state constituting a body corporate.

"Public security" means a bond, note, warrant, certificate of indebtedness, or other obligation for the payment of money, issued by the state, any public body thereof, or any predecessor of any public body of the state, and payable from designated revenues or special fund, but excluding any obligation payable from ad valorem taxes, any obligation constituting a debt or an indebtedness within the meaning of any constitutional, charter, or statutory limitation, any obligation payable within one year from the date of its issuance, and any obligation payable from special assessments.

"Shall" is mandatory.

"State" means the state of Colorado, and any board, commission, department, corporation, instrumentality, or agency thereof.

Words used in this article importing singular or plural number may be construed so that one number includes both; and words importing masculine gender shall be construed to apply to the feminine gender and to the neuter gender as well; but these rules of construction shall not apply to any part of this article containing express provisions excluding such construction, or where the subject matter or context is repugnant thereto.

Source:

L. 63:

p. 886, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 125-8-2.

L. 70:

p. 109, § 3.

L. 89:

(2) repealed, p. 1135, § 85, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(9) amended, p. 1056, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(9) amended, p. 471, § 4, effective July 1.

11-54-103. Refunding public securities.

Any public securities issued by the state, or any public body thereof, may be refunded, without an election, by the state or public body issuing them, or any successor thereof, in the name of the state or public body issuing the public securities being refunded, but subject to provisions concerning their payment and to any other contractual limitations in the proceedings authorizing their issuance or otherwise appertaining thereto, pursuant to an ordinance to be adopted by the governing body of the issuer in the manner provided by law for the issuance of the public securities being refunded, to refund, pay, and discharge all or any part of such outstanding public securities, including any interest thereon in arrears or about to become due, or for the purpose of reducing interest costs or effecting other economies, or of modifying or eliminating restrictive contractual limitations appertaining to the issuance of additional public securities, or to any project appertaining thereto or any combination thereof.

Source:

L. 63:

p. 888, § 3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 125-8-3.

11-54-104. Method of issuance.

Any public securities issued for refunding purposes either may be delivered in exchange for the outstanding public securities being refunded or may be publicly or privately sold.

Source:

L. 63:

p. 888, § 4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 125-8-4.

11-54-105. Limitations upon issuance.

No public securities may be refunded under this article unless the holders thereof voluntarily surrender them for exchange or payment, or unless they either mature or are callable for prior redemption under their terms within ten years from the date of issuance of the refunding public securities. Provision shall be made for paying the public securities within said period of time. No maturity of any public security refunded may be extended over fifteen years, nor may the net effective interest rate of the issue of refunding securities be increased to any rate exceeding the maximum net effective interest rate authorized by the governing body. The principal amount of the refunding public securities may exceed the principal amount of the refunded public securities if the aggregate principal and interest costs of the refunding public securities do not exceed such unaccrued costs of the public securities refunded, except to the extent any interest on the public securities refunded in arrears or about to become due is capitalized with the proceeds of refunding public securities. The principal amount of the refunding public securities may also be less than or the same as the principal amount of the public securities being refunded so long as provision is duly and sufficiently made for their payment. The limitations of this section shall not apply to the refunding of public securities in order to avoid default.

Source:

L. 63:

p. 888, § 5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 125-8-5.

L. 70:

p. 109, § 4.

11-54-106. Use of proceeds of refunding public securities.

The proceeds of refunding public securities shall either be immediately applied to the retirement of the public securities to be refunded or be placed in escrow in any state or national bank within the state which is a member of the federal deposit insurance corporation to be applied to the payment of the public securities upon their presentation therefor; but, to the extent any incidental expenses have been capitalized, such security proceeds may be used to defray such expenses; and any accrued interest and any premium appertaining to a sale of refunding public securities may be applied to the payment of the interest thereon and the principal thereof, or both interest and principal, or may be deposited in a reserve therefor, as the governing body may determine.

No such escrow shall necessarily be limited to proceeds of refunding public securities but may include other moneys available for its purpose. Any escrowed proceeds, pending such use, may be invested or reinvested in securities meeting the investment requirements established in part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S. Such escrowed proceeds and investments, together with any interest to be derived from any such investment, shall be in an amount at all times sufficient as to principal, interest, any prior redemption premium due, any charges of the escrow agent payable therefrom to pay the public securities being refunded as they become due at their respective maturities or due at designated prior redemption dates in connection with which the governing body of the issuer shall exercise a prior redemption option. No purchaser of any public security issued under this article shall in any manner be responsible for the application of the proceeds thereof by the issuer or any of its officers, agents, or employees.

Source:

L. 63:

p. 888, § 6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 125-8-6.

L. 89:

(2) amended, p. 1106, § 6, effective July 1.

11-54-107. Payment of refunding public securities.

Refunding public securities may be made payable from any revenues derived from any utility, system, project, or other source which might be legally pledged for the payment of the public securities being refunded at the time of the refunding or at the time of the issuance of the public securities being refunded, as the governing body of the issuer may determine, notwithstanding the pledge of such revenues for the payment of the outstanding public securities being refunded is thereby modified; but there shall not be pledged for the payment of the refunding public securities any revenues which might not have been lawfully pledged for the payment of the public securities being refunded because of limitations in any question authorizing their issuance, unless the refunding public securities are similarly authorized at an election by the majority required by law for the issuance of the public securities being refunded.

Source:

L. 63:

p. 889, § 7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 125-8-7.

11-54-108. Combination of refunding and other public securities.

Public securities for refunding and public securities for any other authorized purpose may be issued separately or issued in combination in one series or more by the same issuer.

Source:

L. 63:

p. 889, § 8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 125-8-8.

11-54-109. Supplemental provisions.

Except as specifically provided or necessarily implied in this article, the relevant provisions in this article appertaining generally to the public securities being refunded shall be equally applicable in the authorization and issuance of refunding public securities, including their terms and security, the public security ordinance, trust indenture, use and service charges, and other aspects of the public securities.

Source:

L. 63:

p. 891, § 9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 125-8-9.

11-54-110. Governing body's determination final.

The determination of the governing body of the issuer that the limitations under this article imposed upon the issuance of refunding public securities have been met shall be conclusive in the absence of fraud or arbitrary and gross abuse of discretion.

Source:

L. 63:

p. 891, § 10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 125-8-10.

11-54-111. Public security provisions.

Public securities, including refunding public securities issued under this article and local district college revenue securities issued under the provisions of article 71 of title 23, C.R.S., shall bear interest at a rate such that the net effective interest rate of the issue of refunding public securities or local district college revenue securities does not exceed the maximum net effective interest rate authorized. Such interest shall be payable semiannually or annually and evidenced by one or two sets of coupons, if any, executed with the facsimile or manually executed signature of any official of the issuer; except that the first coupon appertaining to any public security may evidence interest not in excess of one year, and such securities may be in one or more series, may bear such date, may mature at such times not exceeding forty years from their respective dates, may be designated or redesignated, may be in such denomination, may be payable in such medium of payment and at such place within or without the state, including but not limited to the office of any county treasurer in which the issuer is located wholly or in part, may carry such registration privileges, may be subject to such terms of prior redemption in advance of maturity in such order or by lot or otherwise at such time with or without a premium, may be executed in such manner, may bear such privileges for reissuance in the same or other denominations, may be so reissued, without modification of maturities and interest rates, and may be in such form, either coupon or registered, as may be provided by ordinance of the governing body of the issuer. The governing body may provide for the subordination of the security of any public securities issued under this article and the payment of principal and interest thereon, to the extent deemed feasible and desirable by the governing body, to other public securities issued to finance facilities appertaining thereto or that may be outstanding when the public securities thus subordinated are issued and delivered.

The public securities shall never be sold at less than ninety-five percent of the principal amount thereof and accrued interest thereon to the date of delivery, nor at a price which will result in a net effective interest rate to the issuer of more than the maximum net effective interest rate authorized by the governing body.

Public securities may be issued with privileges for conversion or registration, or both, for payment as to principal or interest, or both; and, where interest accruing on the public securities is not represented by interest coupons, the public securities may provide for the endorsing of payments of interest thereon; and the public securities generally shall be issued in such manner, in such form, either coupon or registered, with such recitals, terms, covenants, and conditions, and with such other details as may be provided by the governing body, except as otherwise provided in this article.

Subject to the payment provisions specifically provided in this article, the said public securities, any interest coupons thereto attached, and any temporary public securities shall be fully negotiable within the meaning and for all the purposes of investment securities (uniform commercial code), article 8 of title 4, C.R.S., except as the governing body may otherwise provide; and each holder of each such public security, by accepting such security, shall be conclusively deemed to have agreed that such public security, except as otherwise provided, is and shall be fully negotiable within the meaning and for all the purposes of investment securities (uniform commercial code), article 8 of title 4, C.R.S.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the governing body in any proceedings authorizing public securities under this article:

May provide for the initial issuance of one or more public securities, called "public security" in this subsection (5), aggregating the amount of the entire issue, or any designated portion thereof;

May make such provision for installment payments of the principal amount of any such public security as it may consider desirable;

May provide for the making of any such public security, payable to bearer or otherwise, registrable as to principal or as to both principal and interest and, where interest accruing thereon is not represented by interest coupons, for the endorsing of payments of interest on such public securities; and

May further make provision in any such proceedings for the manner and circumstances in and under which any such public security may in the future, at the request of the holder thereof, be converted into public securities of smaller denominations, which public securities of smaller denominations may in turn be either coupon public securities or public securities registrable as to principal or as to both principal and interest.

If lost or completely destroyed, any public security authorized in this article may be reissued in the form and tenor of the lost or destroyed public security upon the owner furnishing, to the satisfaction of the governing body: Proof of ownership; proof of loss or destruction; a surety bond in twice the face amount of the public security, including any unmatured coupons appertaining thereto; and payment of the cost of preparing and issuing the new public security.

Any officer authorized to execute any public security, after filing with the secretary of state his manual signature certified by him under oath, may execute or cause to be executed, with a facsimile signature in lieu of his manual signature, any public security authorized in this article; except that such a filing is not a condition of execution with a facsimile signature of any interest coupon, and except that at least one signature required or permitted to be placed on each such public security, excluding any interest coupon, shall be manually subscribed. The facsimile signature of an officer shall have the same legal effect as his manual signature.

The clerk or secretary of the issuer may cause the seal of the issuer to be printed, engraved, stamped, or otherwise placed in facsimile on any public security. The facsimile seal shall have the same legal effect as the impression of the seal.

The ordinance authorizing any public securities or other instrument appertaining thereto may contain any agreement or provision customarily contained in instruments securing revenue bonds or like public securities, including without limiting the generality of the foregoing, covenants designated in section 11-54-113.

Source:

L. 63:

p. 891, § 11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 125-8-11.

L. 70:

p. 110, § 5.

L. 72:

p. 619, § 159.

L. 75:

(1) amended, p. 785, § 2, effective July 1; (4) amended, p. 207, § 12, effective July 16.

11-54-112. Signatures on public securities.

The public securities and any coupons bearing the signatures of officers in office on the date of the signing thereof shall be valid and binding obligations of the issuer, notwithstanding that before the delivery thereof and payment therefor any of the persons whose signatures appear thereon shall have ceased to be officers of the issuer.

Any officer authorized or permitted to sign any public security or interest coupon, at the time of its execution and of the execution of a signature certificate, may adopt as and for his own facsimile signature the facsimile signature of his predecessor in office in the event that such facsimile signature appears upon the public security or coupons appertaining thereto, or upon both the public security and such coupons.

Source:

L. 63:

p. 892, § 12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 125-8-12.

11-54-113. Covenants in authorizing ordinance.

Any ordinance authorizing the issuance of public securities under this article, or any trust indenture or other instrument appertaining thereto, may contain covenants as to:

The rates, fees, tolls, and charges to be charged for the services and commodities of the facilities, revenues derived from the operation of which are pledged for the payment of the public securities, and the use and disposition thereof, including but not limited to the foreclosure of liens for and collection of delinquencies, the discontinuance of services or facilities, prohibition against free service, the collection of penalties and collection costs, including disconnection and reconnection fees, and the use and disposition of any revenues of the issuer, derived or to be derived from any facilities;

The creation and maintenance of reserves or sinking funds and the regulation, use, and disposition thereof, to secure the payment of the principal of and the interest on any public securities or of operation and maintenance expenses of any facilities, or part thereof; the determination or definition of revenues from any facilities, and of the expenses of operation and maintenance thereof; and the source, custody, security, use, and disposition of any such reserves or sinking funds, including but not limited to the powers and duties of any trustee with regard thereto;

A fair and reasonable payment by the issuer to the account of such facilities for the services, commodities, or facilities furnished to the issuer or any of its departments by any facilities;

The issuance of other or additional public securities or other instruments payable from or constituting a charge against the revenue of any facilities; the payment of the principal of and the interest on any public securities, and the sources and methods thereof, the rank or priority of any public securities as to any lien or security for payment, or the acceleration of any maturity of any public securities, or the issuance of other or additional public securities payable from or constituting a charge against or lien upon any revenues pledged for the payment of public securities and the creation of future liens and encumbrances against these revenues, and limitations thereon; and the purpose to which the proceeds of the sale of public securities may be applied, and the custody, security, use, expenditure, application, and disposition thereof;

Books of account, the inspection and audit thereof, and other records appertaining to facilities; the insurance to be carried by the issuer and use and disposition of insurance moneys, the acquisition of completion or surety bonds appertaining to any project, funds, or personnel, and the use and disposition of any proceeds of such bonds; the assumption or payment or discharge of any indebtedness, other obligation, lien, or other claim relating to any part of any facilities, or any public securities having or which may have a lien on any part of any revenues of the facilities; and limitations on the powers of the issuer to acquire or operate, or permit the acquisition or operation of, any plants, structures, or properties which may compete or tend to compete with the facilities;

The rights, liabilities, powers, and duties arising upon the breach by the issuer of any covenants, conditions, or obligations; defining events of default; the payment of costs or expenses incident to the enforcement of the public securities or of the provisions of the ordinance authorizing the public securities or any trust indenture or other instrument appertaining thereto, or of any covenant or contract with the holders of the public securities; the procedure, if any, by which the terms of any covenant or contract with, or duty to, the holders of public securities, the public security ordinance, any trust indenture or other instrument, may be amended or abrogated, the amount of public securities the holders of which, or any trustee therefor, must consent thereto, and the manner in which such consent may be given or evidenced; the terms and conditions upon which the holders of the public securities or of a specified portion, percentage, or amount thereof, or any trustee therefor, shall be entitled to the appointment of a receiver, which receiver may enter and take possession of the facilities, or any part thereof, operate and maintain the same, prescribe rates, fees, tolls, and charges, and collect, receive, and apply all revenues thereafter arising therefrom in the same manner as the issuer itself might do; and the terms and conditions upon which any or all of the public securities shall become or may be declared due before maturity, and as to the terms and conditions upon which such declaration and its consequences may be waived;

The vesting in a corporate or other trustee of such property, rights, powers, and duties in trust as the issuer may determine, which may include any of the rights, powers, and duties of any trustee appointed by any holders of public securities, and the limitation of liabilities of any such trustee, or the limitation or the abrogation of the right of such holders of public securities to appoint any trustee, or the limitation of the rights, powers, and duties of such trustee; and the terms and conditions upon which the holders of the public securities or any portion or percentage of them may enforce any covenants or provisions made under this article or duties imposed thereby; and

All such acts and things as may be necessary or convenient or desirable in order to secure its public securities or, in the discretion of the governing body of the issuer, tend to make the public securities more marketable, notwithstanding that such covenant, act, or thing may not be enumerated in this article, it being the intention of this article to give an issuer power to do all things in the issuance of public securities and for their security.

Source:

L. 63:

p. 893, § 13.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 125-8-13.

11-54-114. Incontestable recital in public securities.

Any ordinance authorizing, or any trust indenture or other instrument appertaining to, any public securities under this article may provide that each authorized public security shall recite that it is issued under authority of this article. Such recital shall conclusively impart full compliance with all of the provisions of this article, and all public securities issued containing such recital shall be incontestable for any cause whatsoever after their delivery for value.

Source:

L. 63:

p. 895, § 14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 125-8-14.

11-54-115. Cumulative and continuing rights of holders of public securities.

No right or remedy conferred upon any holder of any public security or of any coupon appertaining thereto or any trustee for such holder by this article or by any other law or proceedings appertaining thereto is exclusive of any other right or remedy, but each such right or remedy is cumulative and in addition to every other right or remedy and may be exercised without exhausting and without regard to any other remedy conferred by this article or by any other law.

The failure of any holder of any public securities or coupon issued under this article to proceed as provided in any proceedings appertaining to the issuance of such public security or coupon shall not relieve the issuer, its governing body, or any of its officers, agents, and employees of any liability for failure to perform or carry out any duty, obligation, or other commitment.

Source:

L. 63:

p. 895, § 15.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 125-8-15.

11-54-116. Construction of article.

The powers conferred by this article shall be in addition and supplemental to and not in substitution for, and the limitations imposed by this article shall not affect, the powers conferred by any other law. Public securities may be issued under this article without regard to the provisions of any other law, except as otherwise provided in this article expressly or by necessary implication. Insofar as the provisions of this article are inconsistent with the provisions of any other law, the provisions of this article shall be controlling.

Source:

L. 63:

p. 895, § 16.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 125-8-16.

11-54-117. Validation.

All outstanding refunding public securities of the state and of all public bodies thereof, and all acts and proceedings had or taken, or purportedly had or taken prior to April 27, 1963, by or on behalf of the state or any public body thereof under law or under color of law preliminary to and in the authorization, execution, sale, issuance, and payment, or any combination thereof, of all such public securities are hereby validated, ratified, approved, and confirmed, including but not necessarily limited to the terms, provisions, conditions, and covenants of any ordinance appertaining thereto, the redemption of public securities before maturity and provisions therefor, the levy and collection of rates, tolls, and charges and other revenues appertaining to such public securities, and the acquisition and application of such other revenues, the pledge and use of the proceeds thereof, and the establishment of liens thereon and funds therefor, appertaining to such public securities, except as provided in this article, notwithstanding any lack of power, authority, or otherwise, other than constitutional, and notwithstanding any defects and irregularities, other than constitutional, in such public securities, acts, and proceedings, and in such authorization, execution, sale, issuance, and payment, including without limiting the generality of the foregoing such acts and proceedings appertaining to such public securities all or any part of which have not been issued nor purportedly issued prior to April 27, 1963. Such outstanding public securities are and shall be, and such public securities not issued nor purportedly issued prior to said date shall be, after their issuance, binding, legal, valid, and enforceable obligations of the state or the public body issuing them in accordance with their terms and their authorizing proceedings, subject to the taking or adoption of acts and proceedings not had nor taken nor purportedly had nor taken prior to April 27, 1963, but required by and in substantial and due compliance with laws appertaining to any such public securities not issued nor purportedly issued prior to said date.

Source:

L. 63:

p. 896, § 17.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 125-8-17.

11-54-118. Effect - limitations.

This article shall operate to supply such legislative authority as may be necessary to validate any refunding public security issued and any such acts and proceedings taken prior to April 27, 1963, which the general assembly could have supplied or provided for in the law under which such public securities were issued and such acts or proceedings were taken. This article shall be limited to the validation of public securities, acts, and proceedings to the extent to which the same can be effectuated under the state and federal constitutions. Also this article shall not operate to validate, ratify, approve, confirm, or legalize any public security, act, proceeding, or other matter the legality of which is being contested or inquired into in any legal proceeding now pending and undetermined, and shall not operate to confirm, validate, or legalize any public security, act, proceeding, or other matter which has been determined prior to April 27, 1963, in any legal proceedings to be illegal, void, or ineffective.

Source:

L. 63:

p. 896, § 18.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 125-8-18.

11-54-119. Liberal construction.

This article being necessary to secure the public health, safety, convenience, and welfare, it shall be liberally construed to effect its purposes.

Source:

L. 63:

p. 897, § 19.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 125-8-19.